Tennessee statutes. Title 34 Guardianship
Part 5

Miscellaneous Provisions

34-8-501. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Acts 2010, ch. 817, § 1.

34-8-502. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7001, et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede § 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c)), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in § 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b)).

Acts 2010, ch. 817, § 1.

34-8-503. Transitional provisions.

This chapter applies to guardianship and protective proceedings begun on or after January 1, 2011.

Parts 1, 3, and 4 and §§ 34-8-501 and 34-8-502 apply to proceedings begun before January 1, 2011, regardless of whether a guardianship or protective order has been issued.

Acts 2010, ch. 817, § 1.

Chapters 9, 10

[Reserved]